Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 2. Fiscal Provisions

§§ 25-10-201 through 25-10-209.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 188, §§ 30 through 37, and Laws 1981, ch. 163, § 1, related to fiscal provisions. For present similar provisions, see Chapter 11 of this title.

§ 25-10-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1981, ch. 163, § 1, related to board inquiry into accounts five years in arrears and cancellation if uncollectible. For present similar provisions, see §

9-1-415

.

§ 25-10-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 38, related to the liability for charges of persons committed as not triable by reason of present insanity.

§ 25-10-212.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 27, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1981, ch. 163, § 1, related to liability of relatives for charges of juvenile committed to state hospital. For present similar provisions, see §

25-10-112

.

§§ 25-10-213 and 25-10-214.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 188, §§ 39 and 40, related to the treatment of mentally ill persons sentenced to correctional or penal institutions, and the recovery of costs incurred by a county under this article. For present similar provisions, see §

7-11-307

and Chapter 11 of this title.